California, session 20252026, SB819.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 25138) is added to Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: Article 3.7. Geothermal Waste Study25138. (a) The department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature, no later than July 1, 2026, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, a study regarding the issues that would arise if geothermal waste that is not exempt from generation and handling fees pursuant to this chapter is made exempt from those fees.(b) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this article shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and is repealed on January 1, 2031.SECTION 1.Section 21000 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:21000.The Legislature finds and declares as follows:(a)The maintenance of a quality environment for the people of this state now and in the future is a matter of statewide concern.(b)It is necessary to provide a high-quality environment that at all times is healthful and pleasing to the senses and intellect of people.(c)There is a need to understand the relationship between the maintenance of high-quality ecological systems and the general welfare of the people of the state, including their enjoyment of the natural resources of the state.(d)The capacity of the environment is limited, and it is the intent of the Legislature that the government of the state take immediate steps to identify critical thresholds for the health and safety of the people of the state and take all coordinated actions necessary to prevent those thresholds being reached.(e)Every citizen has a responsibility to contribute to the preservation and enhancement of the environment.(f)The interrelationship of policies and practices in the management of natural resources and waste disposal requires systematic and concerted efforts by public and private interests to enhance environmental quality and to control environmental pollution.(g)It is the intent of the Legislature that all agencies of the state government that regulate activities of private individuals, corporations, and public agencies that are found to affect the quality of the environment shall regulate those activities so that major consideration is given to preventing environmental damage, while providing a decent home and satisfying living environment for all Californians.